Missouri, session 2026, SB1800.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.1558, to read as
follows:
173.1558. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Campus", the physical facilities and grounds of a
postsecondary educational institution;
(2) "Materially and substantially disruptive conduct",
behavior that occurs when a person intentionally engages in
conduct which such person knows or reasonably should know
would significantly hinder another person's or group's
expressive activity, prevent the communication of the
person's or group's message, or prevent the transaction of
the business of a lawful meeting, gathering, or procession,
including by:
(a) Engaging in fighting, violent, or other unlawful
behavior;
(b) Damaging or defacing institutional, public, or
private property;

SB 1800 2
(c) Physically blocking, using threats of violence, or
creating loud or sustained noise or vocalization intended to
prevent any person from attending, listening to, viewing, or
otherwise participating in a meeting, class, or other
activity;
(d) Occupying without institutional consent or
otherwise materially disrupting the ingress, egress, and use
of institutional facilities;
(e) Materially violating reasonable time, place, and
manner restrictions of the institution regarding expressive
activity; or
(f) Engaging in significant and prolonged harassment
of students, faculty, or visitors;
(3) "Postsecondary educational institution", any
approved Missouri public institution of postsecondary
education, as defined in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
section 173.1102;
(4) "State student financial aid", state funds for any
grants or scholarships administered under the authority of
the coordinating board for higher education;
(5) "Student", any person who is enrolled as a student
in courses for academic credit on a full-time, part-time,
temporary, or intermittent basis in a postsecondary
educational institution.
2. (1) Every student of a postsecondary educational
institution who receives state student financial aid shall
be deemed by such receipt to have agreed to observe the
rules and regulations promulgated by the governing authority
of the postsecondary educational institution.
(2) Subject to administrative review and hearing
procedures pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, any
student who receives state student financial aid in

SB 1800 3
connection with his or her matriculation at a postsecondary
educational institution and who, while on the campus of the
postsecondary educational institution, engages in materially
and substantially disruptive conduct and is convicted of a
criminal offense or found by the institution to have
violated any code of conduct as a result of such disruptive
behavior shall be ineligible for state student financial aid
for a period not to exceed the ensuing two academic years.
3. (1) Each postsecondary educational institution
shall refer to the coordinating board for higher education
for final administrative determination in the case of any
student found to have violated the provisions of subsection
2 of this section.
(2) Administrative review and hearing procedures for
the implementation of this section shall be promulgated by
the coordinating board for higher education.
(3) Such procedures shall include those elements of
due process of law required by the Constitution of Missouri
and the United States Constitution.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the
immediate suspension from campus of any student whose
activities materially disrupt the educational and
administrative operations of the institution.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit any postsecondary educational institution from
taking disciplinary or other action against a student or
group of students, or from suspending or refusing to grant
scholarships, loans, fellowships, grants-in-aid, or any
other financial aid given or guaranteed by the state for
academic assistance to any individual, because of any other
misconduct.

SB 1800 4
5. (1) Each postsecondary educational institution
shall adopt a policy detailing students' rights and
responsibilities regarding expressive activities at the
institution.
(2) The policy shall:
(a) Allow:
a. Students enrolled at and employees of the
institution to, subject to reasonable restrictions, engage
in expressive activities on campus, including by responding
to the expressive activities of others; and
b. Student organizations and faculty to invite
speakers to speak on campus;
(b) Prohibit:
a. Using a device to amplify sound while engaging in
expressive activities on campus during class hours;
b. During the last two weeks of a semester or term,
engaging in expressive activities:
(i) In the common outdoor areas of the institution's
campus in a manner that materially and substantially
disrupts the functioning of the institution;
100 (ii) By inviting speakers to speak on campus;
101 (iii) By using a device to amplify sound; or
102 (iv) By using drums or other percussive instruments;
103 c. Camping or erecting tents or other living
104 accommodations on campus;
105 d. Wearing a mask, facial covering, disguise, or other
106 means of concealing a person's identity while engaging in
107 expressive activities on campus with the intent to:
108 (i) Obstruct the enforcement of the institution's
109 rules or the law by avoiding identification;
110 (ii) Intimidate others; or

SB 1800 5
111 (iii) Interfere with an institution employee's or a
112 peace officer's lawful performance of a duty;
113 e. Lowering the institution's flag of the United
114 States or of this state with the intent to raise the flag of
115 another nation or a flag representing an organization or
116 group of people; and
117 f. Engaging in expressive activities on campus between
118 the hours of 10 p.m. and 8 a.m.;
119 (c) Establish disciplinary sanctions for students,
120 student organizations, or employees who unduly interfere
121 with the expressive activities of others on campus or
122 violate an institution policy or state law;
123 (d) Include a grievance procedure for addressing
124 complaints of a violation of this section;
125 (e) Require students enrolled at or employees of the
126 institution to present proof of identity and status at the
127 institution on request by a peace officer on the
128 institution's campus engaging in an official duty;
129 (f) Be approved by a majority vote of the
130 institution's governing board before final adoption; and
131 (g) Be posted on the institution's internet website.
132 6. Nothing in this section limits the authority of a
133 postsecondary educational institution to adopt rules
134 differentiating between the rights of students and employees
135 to engage in expressive activities on campus and those of
136 persons not affiliated with the institution.
✓